Massachusetts, session 194th, H642.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 16C of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 7 and 8, the words “, subject to appropriation,” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- ; provided, that the reimbursement shall not be
subject to appropriation and shall be subject to a monthly allotment; provided further, that such
monthly allotment shall not be less than 1/12th of the regional school district’s transportation
expenditure for the previous year.
of 1